Nebraska statutes.
77-6301.01
Legislative findings.

The Legislature hereby
finds and declares that it is the policy of this state to make revisions in
Nebraska's tax structure in order to encourage entrepreneurship and to increase
investment in high technology industries in underserved areas of Nebraska.

Laws 2014, LB836, § 7.
July 18, 2014